Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2091.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2357.802 of Title 68, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. For taxable years beginning on and after January 1, 2026,
there shall be allowed against the tax imposed by Section 2355 of
Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes a credit for any individual for
rent paid for their primary residence. The credit allowed shall be
refundable and shall not exceed One Hundred Ten Dollars ($110.00)
for tax year 2026, and shall be annually adjusted to reflect price
inflation as measured by the Consumer Price Index for All Urban
Req. No. 10821 Page 1

Cons umers ("CPI-U") published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics for
subsequent tax years.
B. The Oklahoma Tax Commission shall provide a form to claim
the credit. The form shall require information from the individual
including their address, the name of the landlord, the required
monthly rent, and the total amount of rent paid in the tax year.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-10821 AO 12/11/24















Req. No. 10821 Page 2